South Dakota, session 2026, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is created the Developmental Disability Service Delivery Committee. The
committee shall:
(1) Examine the medicaid waiver programs, administered by the Department of
Human Services, which provide home and community-based services to individuals
with intellectual and developmental disabilities, for the purposes of:
(a) Streamlining provider biennial review and accreditation requirements to
reduce administrative burden, improve clarity and consistency, and support
sustainable, individual-centered service delivery; and
(b) Assessing roles and responsibilities to ensure that current practice, policy,
and service delivery match system realities;
(2) Hear testimony from the Department of Human Services on the operation of, and
changes to, the waiver programs;
(3) Seek feedback from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities,
their family members, community support providers, and case management
organizations regarding services provided under the waiver programs; and
(4) Consider proposed legislation or changes to the waiver programs to improve
services and efficiency.
Section 2. The Developmental Disability Service Delivery Committee consists of nine
members:
(1) The chairs of the health and human services committees of the House of
Representatives and the Senate;
(2) The chairs of the appropriations committees of the House of Representatives and
the Senate;

26.141.14 2 15
(3) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
House of Representatives;
(4) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
Senate; and
(5) One member of the minority party, appointed by the Executive Board of the
Legislative Research Council.
Each appointed member shall serve for a term that expires on January first of each
odd-numbered year and may be reappointed without limit. If a position becomes vacant,
the position must be filled, for the duration of the term, in the same manner as the original
appointment.
The Executive Board shall appoint one member to serve as chair, and one member
to serve as vice-chair.
Section 3. The Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council shall provide
administrative services to the Developmental Disability Service Delivery Committee.
The committee shall meet at least one time per year, at the call of the chair.
Section 4. On or before December thirty-first of each year, the Developmental Disability
Service Delivery Committee shall provide a report to the Executive Board of the Legislative
Research Council. The report must include:
(1) A description of the committee's work; and
(2) Any recommendations or proposed legislation to improve the services and
efficiency of the medicaid waiver programs operated by the Department of Human
Services.
Section 5. This Act expires on January 1, 2030.
SB15 ENROLLED

26.141.14 3 15
An Act to create the Developmental Disability Service Delivery Committee.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 15
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 15 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB15 ENROLLED